Utah statutes.
62A-4a-308.   Portion of funding provided by contractor.
The director may require that 25% of the funding for individual programs
contracted by the director under this part be provided by the contractor
operating the program.  Contributions of materials, supplies, or physical
facilities may be considered as all or part of the funding provided by the
contractor.
